troff/libhnj/hyphen.d/hyph_de_DE.dic
UTF-8
% -*- tex -*- vim: ft=tex
% This file has been derived from `dehyphn.tex', revision level 31,
% to which the following applies:
% -----------------------------------------------------------------
% Copyright (C) 1988,1991 Rechenzentrum der Ruhr-Universitaet Bochum
%               [german hyphen patterns]
% Copyright (C) 1993,1994,1999 Bernd Raichle/DANTE e.V.
%               [macros, adaption for TeX 2]
% Copyright (C) 1998--2001 Walter Schmidt
%               [adaption to new German orthography]
% 
% -----------------------------------------------------------------
% IMPORTANT NOTICE:
% 
% This program can be redistributed and/or modified under the terms
% of the LaTeX Project Public License Distributed from CTAN
% archives in directory macros/latex/base/lppl.txt; either
% version 1 of the License, or any later version.
% -----------------------------------------------------------------
% A copy of the original can be obtained from <http://www.tug.org/teTeX/>.
% -----------------------------------------------------------------
% For sending bug reports, follow the instructions on
% <http://n-t-roff.github.io/heirloom/doctools.html>.
% -----------------------------------------------------------------
% Sccsid @(#)hyph_de_DE.dic	1.3 (gritter) 9/3/05
.1be
.1bi
.1br
.1che6f5
.1da8c
.1de
.1di
.1fe
.1fu
.1ga
.1ge
.1k2o
.1ka
.1kr8
.1kü
.1li
.1lös
.1ma
.1mi
.1p2o
.1pe
.1ph6
.1se
.1si
.1spi
.1sy
.1tag
.1ve
.1wah
.1weg
.1zi
.1zu
.2e1ri
.2er3ei
.6a1ba
.8ar6tei
.a1b1l8
.a1b1r
.a1b3u
.a1be
.a1bi2
.a1d
.a1do
.a1n1e
.a2l1t
.a2r1s
.a2r1t
.a3na3c
.a6n1s
.aa6l
.ab3a4s
.ab3ei
.ab3it
.ad3o4r
.alti6
.an2gs
.an5a2l1g
.ang8s2t1
.ap1p
.ar6sc
.ar6ta
.as2z
.au2f1
.au2s3
.b6ie
.be2r1t
.be3na
.be5er1b
.ber6t5r6
.bi2ms
.bie6r5
.bim6s5t
.br6u6s
.brot3
.c8h6
.d2a1ri
.da1r5u
.da2r
.dar5in
.de1re
.de1sp2
.de3s1z
.de5r6en
.de8s2p2o
.den6ka
.des6pe
.dia3s4
.dien4
.dy2s1
.e1p2o1
.e1r5er
.e1re
.e1s1p2
.e2n1d
.e2s8t1l
.e6hr
.e8rd
.eh1re
.ehre6n5
.ei1ne6
.ei6n5eh
.ei6ns
.ei8nen
.ein5sa
.en1de
.en1te
.en3k4
.en4t3r6
.en6d5r4
.en6der
.en8ta8
.en8tei
.er1b
.er1ba
.er1be
.er1du
.er1w
.er3in
.er3o4b
.er6b5ei
.er6ban
.er6bla
.er6d5um
.erbl8
.erwi5s
.es8t1n
.ex1a2
.ex3em
.fa2ls
.fal6sc
.fe6s1t5a
.flu4g3
.furc8h8
.ga1ne
.ga6ner
.ge1s6
.ge3n4a
.ge5rö8
.ha2lb5
.hal1be6
.hal6br
.hau4t
.haup4
.he4r3e
.he5x
.hei1ma6
.her6za
.hi2r1s
.hin3
.hir8sc
.ho4c
.hu3sa
.hy5o
.i1be5
.i1ma
.i1ni6
.i1s5chi
.ima6ge
.in1
.isc8h
.ja6gd5
.ka6l1k
.ka6ph
.kal6k5o
.ki4e
.kop6f3
.kraf6
.kü5ra
.l8i1i
.la2b1b
.lab6br
.liie6
.lo6s5k2
.lö4s3t
.ma5d2
.mi2t1
.mis2s1
.no1to
.no6th
.no6top
.o1b1l8
.o1be
.o1st3a
.o2r1t
.o8bs2
.ob2e8ri
.ob6s1t5e
.or2ts
.or3c
.ort6s5e
.os1te
.oste8r
.p8er
.pe3t2s
.pe4re6
.po8str6
.r6au4m3
.re5an
.ro8q
.ru5the
.rü5b6e2
.sc8h8
.se5n6h
.se5ra
.se6e
.si2e
.sp2
.spi1k
.spi6ke
.st4
.sy2n1
.t8o1ni
.ta1ge
.ta8th
.tage4s5
.tan6kl8
.te6e
.te8str6
.to1d
.to1de4
.to6der
.to6we
.to8nin
.u1ne6
.u1re
.u2mp
.um1
.umpf4
.un1
.un1ge
.ung8e5n
.ur1c
.ur5en
.v2e1ri
.v2or1
.ve6rin
.ver1
.vora8
.wah6l5
.we1ge
.we8ge1s
.we8s2t
.wes3te
.wo6r
.wor3a
.wu6n4s
.z2uc
.zi4e
.zuc8h8
.ä2n1d
.än1de
.ände8re
.öc8h8
1a2b1f8
1a2b1g2
1a2b1n
1a2b1w
1a2d1v
1a2g8o1g
1a2sth
1a2th1l
1ab1k2o
1abdr4
1abhä
1ad1j
1adle
1aero
1afri
1ag1gr4
1ak1k2o
1aka1d
1al1gi
1an1fä
1an1r
1an5l6
1anfa
1ap1pa
1ar2z1t
1au1to
1au2f1n
1au2f1w
1au2s1b2
1au2s1f2
1au2s1w
1au2s3g2
1aus1z
1ba
1be
1bi
1blat
1blu
1bo
1br
1bu
1by1
1bä
1bü
1c6r
1c8hae
1c8o
1ca
1ce
1che1f
1ci
1ck2e1ru
1cka1d
1cke.
1cke1re
1cke2r1t
1cke2rn
1ckel
1cken
1cker.
1ckie
1ckig
1ckun
1cu
1cy
1da.
1dac
1dat
1de
1di
1do
1drah
1dria
1dru
1drü
1du
1dä
1dü
1e2t1n
1e4k1d
1e8x3p2
1egy
1eign8
1elek
1emp1f
1emp1t
1emto
1en2t1z
1extr6
1f8ran
1fe
1fi
1flor
1fo
1fr2is
1fu
1fä
1fü
1g2li1k
1g2lim
1g2ly
1g6hr
1ga
1gan6g5a
1ge
1gi
1gl2on
1gla1d
1glas
1gle.
1glem
1gloa
1glop
1glü
1gna
1gno
1go
1gr4
1gu
1gä
1gö
1gü
1haa
1he2m1m
1hoh
1holz
1in1fo
1k2o
1ka
1kla
1klä
1kr8
1ku
1kä
1kö
1kü
1la.
1la1w
1la2n1d
1le6hr
1ler
1li
1lo1k
1los.
1lun
1ly
1lös
1ma
1me
1mi
1mo
1mun
1my
1män
1mü
1n2a1ri
1n2ah
1n2ar.
1n8aß
1na.
1na1ma
1na1ni
1na1v
1nae
1nag
1nai
1nann
1nau1e
1ne
1ni
1nu
1nys
1näc
1nöt
1o2zea
1o6ns
1o8o1g
1ob1j
1of1fi
1okta
1opti
1or1ga
1or2d1n6
1oram
1p2o
1p2sy
1pak
1pap
1pau
1pe
1ph
1pis
1pres
1pro1d
1prob
1präs
1prüf
1pu
1q6ui
1r2ig
1r4uf
1rar1h8
1re.
1re1no
1rer
1rinn
1ro6hr
1ru2ts
1s2ki.
1s2pek
1s2phä
1s2pur
1sa.
1sa2n1d
1saa
1saf
1sag
1sai
1sal
1sam
1sas
1sat
1sche
1schi
1scho
1schu
1se
1si
1so
1span
1spi
1spra
1spru
1spü
1sta
1sto
1stu
1stä
1stö
1stü
1su
1sy
1sä
1süc
1sün
1t2a1ri
1t2sua
1t2uc
1t6hr6
1t8heo
1ta1fe4
1ta1le
1tag
1te2il
1the.
1thes
1thet
1thy
1ti2l1g
1trag
1trai
1trib
1träg
1tu1e
1tu2m1h
1tu2ms
1ty1
1tön
1tür.
1u2n2if
1un1fä
1ve
1wah
1was
1weg
1wi1d
1wj
1xag
1xe.
1xen
1xes
1xi
1xo
1xu
1zah
1ze
1zi
1zo
1zu
1zwi
1zy
1zä
1zö
1zü
1ße
1ßi
1ßu8
1ähn5l6
1äug
1äuß
1ö2k2o
1öl.
2a1re
2a1ri
2a1ti
2ar2b1t
2b1b
2b1c
2b1d
2b1f8
2b1g2
2b1h
2b1k2
2b1lun
2b1m
2b1n
2b1p2
2b1t
2b1w
2c2ks
2ch.
2chn6
2chs
2cht
2ck.
2d1a2b1g2
2d1an5l6
2d1ar1b
2d1auf
2d1aus
2d1b
2d1c
2d1d
2d1e6hr
2d1f
2d1g
2d1h
2d1i6ns
2d1k
2d1l
2d1m
2d1n6
2d1o8r1g
2d1p
2d1rer
2d1u2n1d
2d1v
2d1w
2d1z
2deal
2deol
2dju
2ds
2dt
2e1ni
2e1ri
2e1ru
2erei
2f1a2r1t
2f1b2
2f1d
2f1ec2k
2f1g2
2f1k2
2f1m
2f1n
2f1op
2f1p8
2f1w
2f1z
2f2f1f
2ff
2fs
2ft
2g1a2t1m8
2g1a6r1m
2g1ar1c
2g1b
2g1f8
2g1g
2g1k
2g1ler
2g1m
2g1n2ah
2g1p2
2g1r2ig
2g1t
2g1w
2g8o1g
2grot
2gs
2gue.
2ha1ni
2hal.
2hein
2hoi
2hö.
2höe
2i1ge
2i1v
2if
2il
2io
2ip
2k1an5l6
2k1b
2k1c
2k1eig
2k1f8
2k1g
2k1h
2k1k2
2k1m
2k1p2
2k1rec
2k1t
2k1w
2k1z
2klic
2kr2ip
2krib
2ks
2l1a2m1t
2l1a8b1s
2l1g
2l1m
2l1o8rd
2l1t
2l1u2m1f6
2l1u2m1w
2l1w
2l1äug
2lb
2lic2k
2ließ
2lint
2ls
2luh
2m1a2mp
2m1b
2m1c
2m1d
2m1f6
2m1g
2m1h
2m1i2m1m
2m1k8
2m1l
2m1m
2m1r
2m1t
2m1v
2m1w
2m1z
2mp
2ms
2n1a2r1t
2n1ang
2n1ar1c
2n1d
2n1e2mp
2n1e2rr
2n1egy
2n1erz
2n1i2mp
2n1i2n1d
2n1i6ns
2n1o2r1t
2n1on1k
2n1u2n1d
2n1unt
2na1x
2nec
2no2b1t
2nu6r
2nup
2p1haf
2p1ler
2p2ft
2p2uc
2p3lig
2p3r2ig
2pe2rr
2pek
2ph.
2po2rn
2pst
2r1a2r1t
2r1ar1b
2r1ex
2r1ir
2r1s
2r1t
2r1u2m1g
2r1u2m1l
2r1unt
2r1ur
2r2t3a2r1t
2r8tu2r1t
2ra6ll
2re2m1t
2reh
2ress
2rn
2rr
2ru2ms
2s1a2r1t
2s1a2t1l
2s1a6ns
2s1a8b1s
2s1ar1b
2s1aus
2s1b2
2s1c8o
2s1ca
2s1d
2s1e2mp
2s1eig
2s1f2
2s1i6ns
2s1in1f
2s1in1h
2s1ku
2s1m
2s1o1do
2s1o8rd
2s1pap
2s1pf
2s1pis
2s1r
2s1sc8h
2s1se
2s1si
2s1so
2s1sä
2s1ta.
2s1ta1ni
2s1tag
2s1tan.
2s1trua
2s1tu1e
2s1tung
2s1unt
2s1v
2s1w
2s1ü2b
2s2cht
2s2s1ei
2s2t1b2
2s2t1g2
2s2t1k2
2s2t1l
2s2t1m8
2s2t1s6
2s2t1t
2s2t1v
2s2t1w
2s2t5r2ig
2s3g2
2s3kow
2s4ch1h
2s5pla
2s5pol
2s6ch1f2
2s7tus
2sch1g
2sch1k2
2sch1z
2siat
2skau
2ssa
2ssö
2ssü
2st.
2sth
2t1a2m1t
2t1a6r1m
2t1an1r
2t1b2
2t1c
2t1d
2t1e6hr
2t1f2
2t1g2
2t1h2il
2t1haa
2t1hau
2t1hö
2t1j
2t1k2
2t1l
2t1m8
2t1n
2t1ony
2t1p2
2t1r2ig
2t1t
2t1unt
2t1v
2t1w
2ta2r1t
2ta6rk
2te1he
2th.
2th1l
2th1m
2to1ti
2trec
2ts
2tz
2uc
2v1b
2v1f
2v1g
2v1k
2v1l
2v1m
2v1p
2v1t
2v1v
2v1z
2v2s
2w1l
2z1a1ra
2z1b
2z1ex
2z1f8
2z1k
2z1l
2z1m
2z1s8
2z1t
2z1v
2z1z
2z1ü2b
2ß1ei
3a8na1ly
3abtei
3adres
3al8a6r1m
3album
3an1n2ah
3angab
3angri
3anzug
3apfel
3arbei
3atlas
3au2s1d
3auf1fü
3auf1ga
3auf1tr6
3auge.
3blau.
3ble.
3blä
3blü
3ch2a1ri
3effek
3eifri
3ele1me
3entl8a
3er1klä
3erb1se
3ernst
3europ
3flöt
3för
3gleic
3glie1d
3i2deal
3i2deol
3indus
3infek
3jä
3klei1d
3kow
3lig
3lo2ch.
3losig
3lä2n1d
3man
3mas
3mes
3mi2t1t
3mäß
3müt
3na1z
3na2cht
3o4pe1ra
3ob2st.
3paa
3par2t1n
3pe2r1s
3preis
3rable
3re1a2k1t
3refl
3ro2ck.
3rö6ll
3rü2mp
3s2kr2ip
3s2krib
3s2t2if
3s2t2il
3s2te2if
3s2te2m1m
3s2te2mp
3s2te6ll
3s2tec
3s2teg
3s2teh
3s2teig
3s2tein
3s2telz
3s2tep
3s2teu1e
3s2ti1tu
3s2tic
3s2tie1b
3s2tieg
3s2tim
3s2tink
3s2trec
3s2uc
3s4kin.
3s8au1e
3s8eit
3s8prec
3sa2ck.
3sa8r1g
3scha.
3schaf
3schal
3schri
3sel.
3str8aß
3strum
3t2hal.
3t4hea
3this
3to1be
3trau1e
3treib
3troc
3umfan
3un1glü
3undzw8
3unfal
3ur5tei
3urlau
3ursac
3zaun
3ä2t1k2
3äq
3ärmel
3ärz2t1l
3ü4ber1
4a1tr6
4aner.
4blic8h
4c2k1h
4ch1h
4ck1ent
4d3a2r1t
4d3in1h
4d3reg
4d3uh
4drec8h
4e1lo
4e1mo
4e5re.
4ene.
4ener.
4erer.
4f1h
4f3lein
4ferd.
4fling
4g1v
4g3ei1se
4g3ex3
4g3i6ns
4g3reic
4g3uh
4gak
4grut
4he1rap
4k1d
4k3arti
4k3leit
4k3ra1d
4k3reic
4k3ä1mi
4kus1ti
4l1au1to
4l1en2t1z
4l3e8r1g
4l3en2t1w
4l3in1du
4l3in1h
4l3o4p8er
4l3o6hr
4l3un1te
4laus3s4
4lektr6
4leu1ro
4li1sam
4lin2k1t
4lipp
4lo2r1t
4lu8r1g
4m3ar1be
4m5auf
4ma2g1g
4n1ein
4n1int
4n1o8r1g
4n1u6hr
4n3e4lem
4n3en3th
4n3i6gel
4n3o4p8er
4n3o8bs
4nauf
4p1d
4peic
4per1si
4ph3t1he
4plei
4r3e8rd
4r3ei6ns
4r3ein1a4
4r3en2t1w
4r3enth
4r3er6ns
4r3erla
4ra2l1g
4reben
4rinst
4ro1fe
4s1a2ff
4s1a2k1t
4s1en2t1z
4s1j
4s1or1ga
4s1t2uc
4s1ta1fe4
4s1te2il
4s1trai
4s1tür.
4s2ta2l1g
4s2ti2g1m
4s2tin1f
4s3alpi
4s3ox
4s3pe2r1s
4s5t8e2ch3n6
4so1pe
4st1r4uf
4st3a6ns
4st3o1pe
4t1au2f1n
4t1elek
4t1holz
4t1hä
4t1reg
4t3en2t1w
4t3er2b1t
4t3re1z
4ta8b1s
4tab.
4te2ff
4tein1h
4teis
4ths
4tre2if
4tüb
4v3w
4v5n
4xis1te
4z1h
4z1p
4z3ak
4z3e2ff
4z3i2mp
4z3oh
4ze2mp
5a4gent
5a6blag
5a6blö
5a6brec
5a6l5eth
5a6mei1se
5a6n1o2d
5a6n3o1ma
5a6no8rd
5ab1ze
5ab1zu
5ad1di
5akro1
5anfe2r1t
5ange1bo
5anhä
5anschl6
5anstal
5antenn
5anwä
5anzeig
5anzieh
5anäs
5atlant
5au4f3ent
5blit
5blum
5blö
5ch4lor
5cha1ra
5cha1to
5chia1d
5chias
5cho.
5chth2on
5cä1
5d4eic
5d6scha.
5dschi1k
5e6las1ti
5elte2rn
5ener1gi
5entwic
5entwu
5epi1d
5epos
5erfül
5erge2b1n
5ergänz
5erhö1hu
5erlös.
5erstat
5erwer1b
5essenz
5f8läc
5flop
5fr4ei.
5ghel.
5glaub
5gleis
5glom
5go1gr4
5gr2if
5he2ft
5hi2tz
5horn.
5in1j
5in1s2pe
5index
5ing2e1ni
5inhab
5instit
5instru
5inte1re
5inter1v
5jo
5kl2ip
5klet
5klop
5l6uk
5la1du
5laken
5lampe.
5le2uc
5lei1stu
5lip1t
5loge.
5lohn
5läuf
5me6ld
5mot
5mün
5n6a2r1s
5n6äi
5na6ui
5nan1c
5napf.
5ne1ei
5nä1e
5näus
5nü.
5nüß
5o4be2r1s
5o6rient
5ohm.
5olym
5orgel.
5p6ty1
5p8ar5tei
5pa1d
5pf8lanz
5pin1se
5pla
5po1ti
5pol
5pr8o1g
5prinz
5py
5ra3fal
5ra6ld
5ran1gi
5re1ha
5ren1te
5rhy1t
5rout
5rö6hr
5römis
5s4hop
5s4tre2if
5s6au1se
5s6h2ip
5s6pom
5s6z4ene.
5scha1de
5schlag
5schlu
5schö
5schü
5sein.
5spal
5spring
5spän
5söm
5süß
5t4he1rap
5t6si1k
5t8e2ch3n6
5tau1se
5tep1pi
5tha.
5ther1f
5thi.
5ti1te
5to2cht
5toll.
5topf.
5tropf
5trub
5trup
5trüb
5täg
5tüc8h
5umlau
5undein
5unge1a2
5w2a1re
5wec8h
5wei1se
5wer1du
5werk.
5wi2r1t
5wunde.
5ya.
5zange.
5zwec2k
5ßa.
5änd2e1ru
5ärge2rn
5ö6dem
5öf2f1n
5öste2rr
5ü2bu
6a1ba
6a1tu
6a2t1f2
6a2t1g2
6a2t1n
6ab8el
6aum
6b1la1d
6b1v
6b3lein
6b5eisen
6blag
6ch1b2
6ch1f2
6ch1p
6ch2m
6ch3unt
6chei
6cher1kl8
6chi6ns
6chuh
6d1a2b1w
6d1re.
6d5a6l1k
6d5o1be
6d5ony
6d5r1h8
6d5unt
6da2b1t
6da6ns
6dan1zu
6de2ff
6din1f
6dje
6do1th
6do8rd
6dur1l
6dursa
6däh
6e1nat
6e1ro.
6e3roi
6elan
6ele1f
6enem.
6enen
6enes
6eren.
6f1an5l6
6f1c
6f1j
6f1r2ig
6f1v
6f1äug
6f3l2on
6f5otte
6f5u2ms
6fap
6fun1f
6g1a2b1w
6g1an5l6
6g1hei
6g1hi
6g1rec
6g3arti
6g5a2m1t
6g5auf
6g5en2t1f2
6g5erz.
6g5oh
6g5unt
6gar1b
6gd
6glass
6gn.
6gonist
6groh
6gue1d
6gä6r1m
6güb
6h1e2mp
6ha1le
6hanz
6har1b
6ho8r1g
6hr
6jm
6k1en2t1z
6k1r2ig
6k1v
6k3ar1be
6k5ein
6k5eis
6k5l6er.
6k5ox
6kin1h
6kner
6kro1ba
6l1e8x3p2
6l1h
6l1j
6l1k
6l1p
6l1ü1b6e2
6l5a2t1m8
6l5en2t1s
6l5er1de
6l5erzie
6l5in1j
6l5u6n2io
6la2ff
6lan1ä
6lann
6larm.
6ld
6le1pi
6le2ff
6lendun
6ler1kl8
6ll
6ln
6lo8r1g
6lu2r1s
6ly2m1p2
6m1ap1pa
6m5ony
6m5uh
6mj
6möl
6n1a6r1m
6n1au1to
6n1au2s1b2
6n1opti
6n1ü2b
6n5e2b1n
6n5e4ne8r1g
6n5erde.
6n5erhö
6n5ertra
6n5in1h
6n5inn
6n5o6le3u
6n5ox
6n5u2m1w
6n5u2ms
6n5un1r
6na2t1m8
6nair
6nopf
6ns
6nu1ni
6o1se
6p1m
6p5heit
6p5les
6p5ling
6p5uh
6paug
6ph1b2
6ph1g
6ph1z
6phn
6r1arz
6r1eign8
6r1emp1f
6r1m
6r1o8o1g
6r3ein1b2
6r5einn
6r5er1nä
6r5erreg
6r5i6tal
6r5olym
6ra1ha
6ra2t1l
6ra8b1z
6ran1ga
6rapf
6raus.
6rein1g
6rein1r
6rer8bs
6rewo
6rinner
6rk
6ro8bs
6run1f
6run2d1z
6s1a2b1t
6s1a2b1w
6s1an5l6
6s1arz
6s1che1f
6s1cu
6s1e8x3p2
6s1prob
6s1ta1le
6s1träg
6s1äuß
6s2chs
6s2t1c
6s2t1d
6s2t1f2
6s2t1i2n1d
6s2t1p2
6s2tz
6s3a4der
6s3an1tr6
6s3e4lem
6s3preis
6s3tre1f
6s4t3eu1ro
6s5eid.
6s5ein1h
6s5en2t1s
6s5i6de1e
6s5o4fen
6s5pig
6s5pin1se
6s5po1ti
6s5pos
6s5py
6s5tep1pi
6s5toll.
6s5topf.
6s5tr6aum
6s5u6ran
6s5ä2n1d
6s6ch1p
6salter
6sch1n8aß
6sch1v
6sch3mäß
6scho8rd
6ser1öf
6sk.
6skn8
6sna
6snot
6ss5um
6st1re1no
6st3re1v
6st5a8n1w
6st5an1f
6star1b
6staus
